Utah statutes.
9-3-508.   Relation to certain acts.

(1)  The authority is exempt from:

(a)  Title 51, Chapter 5, Funds Consolidation Act;

(b)  Title 63A, Utah Administrative Services Code;

(c)  Title 63G, Chapter 6, Utah Procurement Code;

(d)  Title 63J, Chapter 1, Budgetary Procedures Act; and

(e)  Title 67, Chapter 19, Utah State Personnel Management Act.

(2)  The authority shall be subject to audit by the state auditor pursuant to Title 67, Chapter 3, Auditor, and by the legislative auditor general pursuant to Section 36-12-15.

